North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 1. Definitions, General Provisions and Remedies.
§ 130A-24.
Appeals procedure.

Appeals concerning the enforcement of rules adopted by the Commission, concerning the suspension and revocation of permits and program participation by the Secretary and concerning the imposition of administrative penalties by the Secretary shall be governed
by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act.

(a1) Any person appealing an action taken by the Department pursuant to this Chapter or rules of the Commission shall file a petition for a contested case with the Office of Administrative Hearings as provided in

G.S. 150B-23(a)

. The petition shall be filed not later than 30 days after notice of the action which confers the right of appeal unless a federal statute or regulation provides for a different time limitation. The time limitation
imposed under this subsection shall commence when notice of the agency decision is given to all persons aggrieved. Such notice shall be provided to all persons known to the agency by personal delivery or by the placing of notice
in an official depository of the United States Postal Service addressed to the person at the latest address provided to the agency by the person.

Appeals concerning the enforcement of rules adopted by the local board of health and concerning the imposition of administrative penalties by a local health director shall be conducted in accordance with this subsection and subsections (c) and (d) of
this section. The aggrieved person shall give written notice of appeal to the local health director within 30 days of the challenged action. The notice shall contain the name and address of the aggrieved person, a description of
the challenged action and a statement of the reasons why the challenged action is incorrect. Upon filing of the notice, the local health director shall, within five working days, transmit to the local board of health the notice
of appeal and the papers and materials upon which the challenged action was taken.

The local board of health shall hold a hearing within 15 days of the receipt of the notice of appeal. The board shall give the person not less than 10 days’ notice of the date, time and place of the hearing. On appeal, the board shall have authority to
affirm, modify or reverse the challenged action. The local board of health shall issue a written decision based on the evidence presented at the hearing. The decision shall contain a concise statement of the reasons for the decision.

A person who wishes to contest a decision of the local board of health under subsection (b) of this section shall have a right of appeal to the district court having jurisdiction within 30 days after the date of the decision by the board. The scope of
review in district court shall be the same as in

G.S. 150B-51

.

The appeals procedures enumerated in this section shall apply to appeals concerning the enforcement of rules, the imposition of administrative penalties, or any other action taken by the Department of Environmental Quality pursuant to Articles 8, 9, 10,
11, and 12 of this Chapter.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 482; c. 827, s. 248; 1993, c. 211, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.66; 1998-217, s. 33; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (e).

§ 130A-25.
Misdemeanor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Except as otherwise provided, a person who violates a provision of this Chapter or the rules adopted by the Commission or a local board of health shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person convicted under this section for violation of

G.S. 130A-144(f)

or

G.S. 130A-145

shall not be sentenced under Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes but shall instead be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of no more than two years and shall serve any prison sentence in McCain Hospital,
Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, McCain, North Carolina; the North Carolina Correctional Center for Women, Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice,
Raleigh, North Carolina; or any other confinement facility designated for this purpose by the Secretary of Public Safety after consultation with the State Health Director. The Secretary of Public Safety shall consult with the State
Health Director concerning the medical management of these persons.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 148-4.1

,

G.S. 148-13

, or any other contrary provision of law, a person imprisoned for violation of

G.S. 130A-144(f)

or

G.S. 130A-145

shall not be released prior to the completion of the person’s term of imprisonment unless and until a determination has been made by the District Court that release of the person would not create a danger to the
public health. This determination shall be made only after the medical consultant of the confinement facility and the State Health Director, in consultation with the local health director of the person’s county of residence, have
made recommendations to the Court.

A violation of Part 7 of Article 9 of this Chapter or G.S. 130A-309.10(m) shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 19; 1991, c. 187, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 946; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 18; 2010-180, s. 14(d); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (j); 2017-186, ss.
2(vvvvv), 3(a).

Cross References.

Penalties for failure to comply with provisions of Part 1C or local ordinances, rules, laws, etc. adopted pursuant to Part 2 of Article 23 of this Chapter, see G.S. 130A-22(h1).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-180, s. 14(d), effective July 1, 2011, added “Except as otherwise provided” at the beginning of subsection (a); and added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), and (j), effective January 1, 2012, in subsection (b), substituted “Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction” for “Division of Prisons, Department of Correction” twice, and substituted “Secretary of
Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” twice.

Session Laws 2017-186, ss. 2(vvvvv), 3(a), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(r), in subsection (b), substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” twice and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary
of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 130A-25.
Misdemeanor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Except as otherwise provided, a person who violates a provision of this Chapter or the rules adopted by the Commission or a local board of health shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person convicted under this section for violation of

G.S. 130A-144(f)

or

G.S. 130A-145

shall not be sentenced under Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes but shall instead be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of no more than two years and shall serve any prison sentence in McCain Hospital,
Division of Prisons, McCain, North Carolina; the North Carolina Correctional Center for Women, Division of Prisons, Raleigh, North Carolina; or any other confinement facility designated for this purpose by the Secretary of Adult
Correction after consultation with the State Health Director. The Secretary of Adult Correction shall consult with the State Health Director concerning the medical management of these persons.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 148-4.1

,

G.S. 148-13

, or any other contrary provision of law, a person imprisoned for violation of

G.S. 130A-144(f)

or

G.S. 130A-145

shall not be released prior to the completion of the person’s term of imprisonment unless and until a determination has been made by the District Court that release of the person would not create a danger to the
public health. This determination shall be made only after the medical consultant of the confinement facility and the State Health Director, in consultation with the local health director of the person’s county of residence, have
made recommendations to the Court.

A violation of Part 7 of Article 9 of this Chapter or G.S. 130A-309.10(m) shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 19; 1991, c. 187, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 946; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 18; 2010-180, s. 14(d); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (j); 2017-186, ss.
2(vvvvv), 3(a); 2021-180, ss. 19C.9(o), (r).

Cross References.

Penalties for failure to comply with provisions of Part 1C or local ordinances, rules, laws, etc. adopted pursuant to Part 2 of Article 23 of this Chapter, see G.S. 130A-22(h1).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (r), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division
of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section
of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the
departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-180, s. 14(d), effective July 1, 2011, added “Except as otherwise provided” at the beginning of subsection (a); and added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), and (j), effective January 1, 2012, in subsection (b), substituted “Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction” for “Division of Prisons, Department of Correction” twice, and substituted “Secretary of
Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” twice.

Session Laws 2017-186, ss. 2(vvvvv), 3(a), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(r), in subsection (b), substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” twice and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary
of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 130A-26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 311, s. 1.

§ 130A-26.1.
Criminal violation of Article 9.

The definition of “person” set out in

G.S. 130A-290

shall apply to this section. In addition, for purposes of this section, the term “person” shall also include any responsible corporate or public officer or employee.

No proceeding shall be brought or continued under this section for or on account of a violation by any person who has previously been convicted of a federal violation based upon the same set of facts.

In proving the defendant’s possession of actual knowledge, circumstantial evidence may be used, including evidence that the defendant took affirmative steps to shield himself from relevant information. Consistent with the principles of common law, the
subjective mental state of defendants may be inferred from their conduct.

For the purposes of the felony provisions of this section, a person’s state of mind shall not be found “knowingly and willfully” or “knowingly” if the conduct that is the subject of the prosecution is the result of any of the following occurrences or
circumstances:

A natural disaster or other act of God which could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight.

An act of third parties other than agents, employees, contractors, or subcontractors of the defendant.

An act done in reliance on the written advice or emergency on-site direction of an employee of the Department of Environmental Quality. In emergencies, oral advice may be relied upon if written confirmation is delivered to the employee as soon as practicable
after receiving and relying on the advice.

An act causing no significant harm to the environment or risk to the public health, safety, or welfare and done in compliance with other conflicting environmental requirements or other constraints imposed in writing by environmental agencies or officials
after written notice is delivered to all relevant agencies that the conflict exists and will cause a violation of the identified standard.

Violations of permit limitations causing no significant harm to the environment or risk to the public health, safety, or welfare for which no enforcement action or civil penalty could have been imposed under any written civil enforcement guidelines in
use by the Department of Environmental Quality at the time, including but not limited to, guidelines for the pretreatment permit civil penalties. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the Department of Environmental
Quality to develop or use written civil enforcement guidelines.

All general defenses, affirmative defenses, and bars to prosecution that may apply with respect to other criminal offenses under State criminal offenses may apply to prosecutions brought under this section or other criminal statutes that refer to this
section and shall be determined by the courts of this State according to the principles of common law as they may be applied in the light of reason and experience. Concepts of justification and excuse applicable under this section
may be developed in the light of reason and experience.

Any person who knowingly and willfully does any of the following shall be guilty of a Class I felony, which may include a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day of violation, provided that this fine shall not exceed a cumulative
total of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each period of 30 days during which a violation continues:

Transports or causes to be transported any hazardous waste identified or listed under G.S. 130A-294(c) to a facility which does not have a permit or interim status under G.S. 130A-294(c) or 42 U.S.C. § 6921, et seq.

Transports or causes to be transported such hazardous waste with the intent of delivery to a facility without a permit.

Treats, stores, or disposes of such hazardous waste without a permit or interim status under G.S. 130A-294(c) or 42 U.S.C. § 6921, et seq., or in knowing violation of any material condition or requirement or such permit or applicable interim status rules.

Any person who knowingly and willfully does any of the following shall be guilty of a Class I felony, which may include a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day of violation, provided that the fine shall not exceed a cumulative
total of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each period of 30 days during which a violation continues:

Transports or causes to be transported hazardous waste without a manifest as required under G.S. 130A-294(c).

Transports hazardous waste without a United States Environmental Protection Agency identification number as required by rules promulgated under G.S. 130A-294(c).

Omits material information or makes any false material statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with rules promulgated under G.S. 130A-294(c).

Generates, stores, treats, transports, disposes of, exports, or otherwise handles any hazardous waste or any used oil burned for energy recovery and who knowingly destroys, alters, conceals, or fails to file any record, application, manifest, report,
or other document required to be maintained or filed for purposes of compliance with rules promulgated under G.S. 130A-294(c).

Provides false information or fails to provide information relevant to a decision by the Department as to whether or not to enter into a brownfields agreement under Part 5 of Article 9 of this Chapter.

Provides false information or fails to provide information required by a brownfields agreement under Part 5 of Article 9 of this Chapter.

Provides false information relevant to a decision by the Department pursuant to:

G.S. 130A-308(b).

G.S. 130A-310.7(c).

G.S. 143-215.3(f).

G.S. 143-215.84(e).

For the purposes of subsections (f) and (g) of this section, the phrase “knowingly and willfully” shall mean intentionally and consciously as the courts of this State, according to the principles of common law interpret the phrase in the light of reason
and experience.

Any person who knowingly transports, treats, stores, disposes of, or exports any hazardous waste or used oil regulated under G.S. 130A-294(c) in violation of subsection (f) or (g) of this section, who knows at the time that he thereby places another person
in imminent danger of death or personal bodily injury shall be guilty of a Class C felony which may include a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per day of violation, provided that this fine
shall not exceed a cumulative total of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each period of 30 days during which a violation continues.

For the purposes of this subsection, a person’s state of mind is knowing with respect to:

His conduct, if he is aware of the nature of his conduct;

An existing circumstance, if he is aware or believes that the circumstance exists; or

A result of his conduct, if he is aware or believes that his conduct is substantially certain to cause danger of death or serious bodily injury.

Under this subsection, in determining whether a defendant who is a natural person knew that his conduct placed another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury:

The person is responsible only for actual awareness or actual belief that he possessed; and

Knowledge possessed by a person other than the defendant but not by the defendant himself may not be attributed to the defendant.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subsection that the conduct charged was conduct consented to by the person endangered and that the danger and conduct charged were reasonably foreseeable hazards of an occupation, a business, or
a profession; or of medical treatment or medical or scientific experimentation conducted by professionally approved methods and such other person had been made aware of the risks involved prior to giving consent. The defendant
may establish an affirmative defense under this subdivision by a preponderance of the evidence.

Any person convicted of an offense under subsection (f), (g), or (h) of this section following a previous conviction under this section shall be subject to a fine, or imprisonment, or both, not exceeding twice the amount of the fine, or twice the term
of imprisonment provided in the subsection under which the second or subsequent conviction occurs.

History.
1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1045, s. 9; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1303-1305; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-357, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.67; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 130A-26.2.
Penalty for false reporting under Article 9.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under Article 9 of this Chapter or rules adopted under Article 9 of this
Chapter; or who knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in a rule-making proceeding or contested case under Article 9 of this Chapter; or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any recording or monitoring
device or method required to be operated or maintained under Article 9 of this Chapter or rules adopted under Article 9 of this Chapter is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. The maximum fine that may be imposed for an offense under this
section is ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 598, s. 3.

§ 130A-26.3.
Limitations period for certain groundwater contamination actions.

The 10-year period set forth in

G.S. 1-52(16)

shall not be construed to bar an action for personal injury, or property damages caused or contributed to by groundwater contaminated by a hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant, including personal injury or property
damages resulting from the consumption, exposure, or use of water supplied from groundwater contaminated by a hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant. For purposes of this section, “contaminated by a hazardous substance, pollutant,
or contaminant” means the concentration of the hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant exceeds a groundwater quality standard set forth in 15A NCAC 2L.0202.

History.
2014-17, s. 3; 2014-44, s. 1(b), (c).

Cross References.

As to limitations on actions for personal injury or physical damage to property, see

G.S. 1-52

.

§ 130A-26.4.
Violations of Article 4.

A person who commits any of the following acts shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor:

Willfully and knowingly makes any false statement in a certificate, record, or report required by Article 4 of this Chapter.

Removes or permits the removal of a dead body of a human being without authorization provided in Article 4 of this Chapter.

Refuses or fails to furnish correctly any information in the person’s possession or furnishes false information affecting a certificate or record required by Article 4 of this Chapter.

Fails, neglects, or refuses to perform any act or duty required by Article 4 of this Chapter or by the instructions of the State Registrar prepared under authority of the Article.

Charges a fee for performing any act or duty required by Article 4 of this Chapter or by the State Registrar pursuant to Article 4 of this Chapter, other than fees specifically authorized by law.

A person who commits any of the following acts shall be guilty of a Class I felony:

Willfully and knowingly makes any false statement in an application for a certified copy of a vital record, or who willfully and knowingly supplies false information intending that the information be used in the obtaining of any copy of a vital record.

Without lawful authority and with the intent to deceive makes, counterfeits, alters, amends, or mutilates a certificate, record, or report required by Article 4 of this Chapter or a certified copy of the certificate, record, or report.

Willfully and knowingly obtains, possesses, sells, furnishes, uses, or attempts to use for any purpose of deception, a certificate, record, or report required by Article 4 of this Chapter or a certified copy of the certificate, record, or report, which
is counterfeited, altered, amended, or mutilated, or which is false in whole or in part or which relates to the birth of another person, whether living or deceased.

When employed by the Vital Records Section of the Department or designated under Article 4 of this Chapter, willfully and knowingly furnishes or processes a certificate of birth, death, marriage, or divorce, or certified copy of a certificate of birth,
death, marriage, or divorce with the knowledge or intention that it be used for the purposes of deception.

Without lawful authority possesses a certificate, record, or report required by Article 4 of this Chapter or a certified copy of the certificate, record, or report knowing that it was stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained.

Willfully alters, except as provided by

G.S. 130A-118

, or falsifies a certificate or record required by Article 4 of this Chapter; or willfully alters, falsifies, or changes a photocopy, certified copy, extract copy, or any document containing information
obtained from an original or copy of a certificate or record required by Article 4 of this Chapter; or willfully makes, creates, or uses any altered, falsified, or changed record, reproduction, copy, or document for the
purpose of attempting to prove or establish for any purpose whatsoever any matter purported to be shown on it.

Without lawful authority, manufactures or possesses the seal of: (i) the Vital Records Section, (ii) a county register of deeds, or (iii) a county health department, or without lawful authority, manufactures or possesses a reproduction or a counterfeit
copy of the seal.

Without lawful authority prepares or issues any certificate which purports to be an official certified copy of a vital record.

Without lawful authority, manufactures or possesses Vital Records Section, county register of deeds, or county health department vital records forms or safety paper used to certify births, deaths, marriages, and divorces, or reproductions or counterfeit
copies of the forms or safety paper.

Willfully and knowingly furnishes a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth with the intention that it be used by an unauthorized person or for an unauthorized purpose.

History.
1995, c. 311, s. 2; 2018-142, s. 17.

§ 130A-26A.

Recodified as

G.S. 130A-26.4

by Session Laws 2018-142, s. 17, effective December 14, 2018.

§ 130A-27.
Recovery of money.

The Secretary or the Secretary of Environmental Quality may institute an action in the county where the action arose or the county where the defendant resides to recover any money, other property or interest in property or the monetary value of goods
or services provided or paid for by the Department or the Secretary of Environmental Quality which are wrongfully paid or transferred to a person under a program administered by the Department or the Secretary of Environmental Quality
pursuant to this Chapter.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.68; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” three times.

§ 130A-28.
Forfeiture of gain.

In the case of a violation of this Chapter or the rules adopted by the Commission, money or other property or interest in property so acquired shall be forfeited to the State unless ownership by an innocent person may be established. An action may be
instituted by the Attorney General or a district attorney pursuant to

G.S. 1-532

.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.